Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB83.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 12-184b is hereby amended to read as follows: 12-
184b. (a) Subject to subsection (b) and K.S.A. 12-1039, and amendments
thereto, any city may adopt by ordinance one of the following forms of
government:
(1) Commission;
(2) mayor-council;
(3) commission-manager;
(4) mayor-council-manager;
(5) council-manager; or
(6) any other form of government authorized by law or by ordinance
or charter ordinance of the city.
(b) Any city which that has operated for four or more years under a
form of government may abandon such form and adopt a different form of
government. The provisions of K.S.A. 12-184, and amendments thereto,
shall govern the procedure for the adoption or abandonment of such form
of government.
(c) The governing body of the city may establish by ordinance any of
the following:
(1) The powers and duties of the governing body, including the mayor
and other elected officials;
(2) the terms of office of members of the governing body, including
the mayor and other elected officials of either two, three or four years;
(3) the election by ward or district of members of the governing body,
if applicable;
(4) the powers and duties of the city manager, if applicable;
(5) the administrative departments of the city; and
(6) other matters deemed appropriate by the governing body.
(d) Any city that has established extraterritorial zoning regulations
or subdivision regulations shall consider such territory outside the
corporate limits of the city part of the city for purposes of all city

SB 83 2
elections. Qualified electors living within such territory outside the
corporate limits of the city shall be considered qualified electors of the
city.
(e) (1) The voting area for any member of the city governing body,
including the mayor, who is elected at large, shall include the territory
subject to extraterritorial zoning or subdivision regulations.
(2) If the governing body members are elected by district, at least one
such district shall include such territory outside the corporate limits of the
city.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 12-184b is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.